Massachusetts, session 194th, H2638.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 158 of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the
following 4 paragraphs:-
The agents employed by the parole board shall, in accordance with the rules and
regulations of the board, supervise, counsel and advise prisoners released on parole from the
correctional institutions of the commonwealth, or from any institution to which they were
removed therefrom and shall assist them in securing employment. The agents shall:
(a) meet and communicate on a monthly basis with parole eligible individuals in the
department of correction at least 180 days in advance of a release hearing to ensure that a viable
home plan is completed and presented at the hearing;
(b) engage with community housing providers and develop pool of long-term residential
providers, transitional and sober homes as well as community based behavioral health providers;
of 3

(c) connect with community providers to ensure proper referral and connections are made
prior to release;
(d) participate in monthly facility level triage meetings with department of correction
staff; and
(e) ensure all individuals released from department of correction facilities to parole do so
with a state identification and birth certificate.
The department of correction shall submit to the board an individual case summary for
each parole eligible individual that shall:
(a) provide detailed summary of incarceration that includes:
(1) offenses and sentence structure;
(2) institutional record of behavior to include major disciplinary infractions and sanctions
imposed;
(3) health, behavioral health and substance use disorder information, any education,
treatment or program participation and completion; and
(4) identify all moderate to high need areas as identified by the risk needs assessment and
provide recommended interventions or service matching to address said need areas; and
(b) provide recommendation of proper community placements in the community to the
board in writing prior to the hearing.
Within 30 business days of release, a risk assessment and case plan, in collaboration with
and signed by the parolee, shall be completed by the agents of the parole board. The plan shall
of 3

address individual factors, identified need areas, in addition to social determinants such as
employment, housing, education, health and behavioral healthcare. Risk assessments shall be
conducted every 6 months thereafter. Case plans shall be reviewed and modified accordingly
every 6 months, if goals are achieved a new case plan shall be developed.
Face-to-face contacts by agents of the parole board with supervised individuals shall be
need-based and focus on identified needs and goals of case plan. The board shall provide support
and guidance to supervised individuals regarding job training and employment, education,
housing, health and behavioral treatment and programming.
of 3